Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.086

Contracts with associate development organizations—Schedule of awards.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5677-S.SL) ***

To the extent that funds are specifically appropriated therefor, contracts with associate development organizations for the provision of services under *RCW 43.330.080(1) shall be awarded according to the following annual schedule:

(1) For associate development associations serving urban counties, which are counties other than rural counties as defined in RCW 82.14.370, a locally matched allocation of up to ninety cents per capita, totaling no more than three hundred thousand dollars per organization; and

(2) For associate development associations in rural counties, as defined in RCW 82.14.370, a per county base allocation of up to forty thousand dollars and a locally matched allocation of up to ninety cents per capita.

[ 2008 c 131 s 3; 2007 c 249 s 5.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.330.080 was amended by 2012 c 195 s 1, changing the subsection numbering.

Effective date—2008 c 131: See note following RCW 43.160.020.

Findings—Intent—2007 c 249: See note following RCW 43.330.080.